Utah statutes.
31A-30-112.   Employee participation levels.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and Section 31A-30-206, a requirement used by a covered carrier in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer, including a requirement for minimum participation of eligible employees and minimum employer contributions, shall be applied uniformly among all small employers with the same number of eligible employees applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the covered carrier.

(b)  In addition to applying Subsection 31A-1-301(124), a covered carrier may require that a small employer have a minimum of two eligible employees to meet participation requirements.

(2)  A covered carrier may not increase a requirement for minimum employee participation or a requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small employer is accepted for coverage.



Amended by Chapter 253, 2012 General Session

